apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_noms.en.dix
 <pardef n="p/erson__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which remove -erson and add eople or directly add -s (LR; formal/legal English mainly)">
     <p>
       <l>erson</l>
       <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>eople</l>
       <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ersons</l>
       <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="personnel__n">
   <e c="CP: plural noun, uncountable">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="staff__n">
   <e c="CP: singular spelling">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e c="CP: plural spelling: invariable singular form">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR" c="CP: alternative plural spelling (not very common): add -s">
     <p>
       <l>s</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="child__n">
   <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e c="CP: add -ren (noun with irregular plural)">
     <p>
       <l>ren</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

<pardef n="m/ouse__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ouse</l>
          <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e c="CP: add -ice (noun with irregular plural)">
        <p>
          <l>ice</l>
          <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="f/oot__n">
    <e>
     <p>
       <l>oot</l>
       <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e c="CP: add -eet (noun with irregular plural)">
     <p>
       <l>eet</l>
       <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR" c="CP: alternative plural form, not very frequent (same form as singular)">
     <p>
       <l>oot</l>
       <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="br/other__n">
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>other</l>
       <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR" c="CP: add -ethren (alternative plural form; irregular)">
     <p>
       <l>ethren</l>
       <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e c="CP: add -others (regular plural form)">
     <p>
       <l>others</l>
       <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
 <pardef n="stimul/us__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns that remove -us and add -i (normally applied to words of Latin origin), or remain the same (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>us</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>i</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>us</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
 <pardef n="larva__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which add -e (normally applied to words of Latin origin), or -s (LR)">
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
   <e>
      <p>
         <l>e</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>s</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
 </pardef>
 
 <pardef n="ind/ex__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns that remove -ex and add -exes or -ices (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>ex</l>
       <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>exes</l>
       <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ices</l>
       <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
 <pardef n="appendi/x__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns that remove -x and add -ces or -xes (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>x</l>
       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>ces</l>
       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>xes</l>
       <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

  
  <pardef n="criteri/on__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns that remove -on and add -a or -ons(LR)">
     <p>
       <l>on</l>
       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>a</l>
       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>ons</l>
       <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="ox__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which add -en">
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
   <e>
      <p>
         <l>en</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="quiz__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which add -zes">
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
   <e>
      <p>
         <l>zes</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="schema__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which add -s or -ta (LR)">
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
   <e>
      <p>
         <l>s</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
      <p>
         <l>ta</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
 
  <pardef n="gen/us__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns that remove -us and add -era or -uses (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>us</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>era</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>uses</l>
       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="tableau__n">
   <e c="CP: nouns which add -x (some nouns of French origin)or -s (USA; LR)">
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
   <e>
      <p>
         <l>x</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
      <p>
         <l>s</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="t/ooth__n">
    <e>
     <p>
       <l>ooth</l>
       <r>ooth<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e c="CP: add -eeth (noun with irregular plural)">
     <p>
       <l>eeth</l>
       <r>ooth<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="g/oose__n">
    <e>
     <p>
       <l>oose</l>
       <r>oose<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e c="CP: add -eese (noun with irregular plural)">
     <p>
       <l>eese</l>
       <r>oose<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
 
  
  <pardef n="dilettant/e__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which remove -e and add -i or -es (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>e</l>
       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>i</l>
       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>es</l>
       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="kibbutz__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which add -im">
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>im</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="librett/o__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which remove -o and add -i or -os (LR)">
     <p>
       <l>o</l>
       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>i</l>
       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e r="LR">
     <p>
       <l>os</l>
       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="lir/a__n">
    <e c="CP: nouns which remove -a and add -e">
     <p>
       <l>a</l>
       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>e</l>
       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>
  

<e c="MG: és animat?"><i>police</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="staff"><i>staff</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
<e lm="child"><i>child</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
<e lm="remains"><i>remains</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="complex"><i>compl</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="brother"><i>br</i><par n="br/other__n"/></e>
<e lm="clothes"><i>clothes</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="foot"><i>f</i><par n="f/oot__n"/></e>
<e lm="index"><i>ind</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e c="MG: és animat? potser no"><i>personnel</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="pants"><i>pants</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="jeans"><i>jeans</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="person, people"><i>p</i><par n="p/erson__n"/></e>
<e lm="bacteria"><i>bacteria</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
<e lm="tuna"><i>tuna</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
<e lm="customs"><i>customs</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="surroundings"><i>surroundings</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="mouse"><i>m</i><par n="m/ouse__n"/></e>
<e lm="tooth"><i>t</i><par n="t/ooth__n"/></e>
<e lm="trousers"><i>trousers</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="binoculars"><i>binoculars</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="annex"><i>ann</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="goose"><i>g</i><par n="g/oose__n"/></e>
<e lm="scissors"><i>scissors</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="multiplex"><i>multipl</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="grandchild"><i>grandchild</i><par n="child__n"/></e>
<e lm="panties"><i>panties</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="criterion"><i>criteri</i><par n="criteri/on__n"/></e>
<e lm="spandex"><i>spand</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="insignia"><i>insignia</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
<e lm="crucifix"><i>crucifi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="apex"><i>ap</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="appendix"><i>appendi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="vertebra"><i>vertebra</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="beau"><i>beau</i><par n="tableau__n"/></e>
<e lm="prefix"><i>prefi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="placenta"><i>placenta</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="affix"><i>affi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="alms"><i>alms</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="telex"><i>tel</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="pupa"><i>pupa</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="melisma"><i>melisma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="trousseau"><i>trousseau</i><par n="tableau__n"/></e>
<e lm="tibia"><i>tibia</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="suffix"><i>suffi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="amoeba"><i>amoeba</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="curia"><i>curia</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="fibroepithelioma"><i>fibroepithelioma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="remex"><i>rem</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="taenia"><i>taenia</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="neurula"><i>neurula</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="circumflex"><i>circumfl</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="neurilemma"><i>neurilemma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="anthelix"><i>antheli</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="syntagma"><i>syntagma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="neurofibroma"><i>neurofibroma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="trabecula"><i>trabecula</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="narthex"><i>narth</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="zygoma"><i>zygoma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="myxoma"><i>myxoma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="decidua"><i>decidua</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="empyema"><i>empyema</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="mesoappendix"><i>mesoappendi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="lymphosarcoma"><i>lymphosarcoma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="fimbria"><i>fimbria</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="columella"><i>columella</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="infix"><i>infi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/></e>
<e lm="diastema"><i>diastema</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="pheocromocytoma"><i>pheocromocytoma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="fibroma"><i>fibroma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="synechia"><i>synechia</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="pontifex"><i>pontif</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="codex"><i>cod</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="craniopharyngioma"><i>craniopharyngioma</i><par n="schema__n"/></e>
<e lm="simplex"><i>simpl</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
